Hawaii statutes.
§84-33 Disciplinary action for violation.
In addition to any other powers the civil service commission or other authority
may have to discipline employees, the civil service commission or authority may
reprimand, put on probation, demote, suspend, or discharge an employee found to
have violated the code of ethics. [L 1972, c 163, pt of §1; am L 1981, c 82,
§13]

Cross References

Civil service, merit appeals board, etc., see §26-5 and chapter 76.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next